Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
Article 3 Amusement Ride Safety

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446, redesignated Chapter 12 of Title 34 as this article.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Amusement ride safety, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Labor, Inspection - Child Labor Regulations, Chapter 300-8-1.

25-15-50.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Amusement Ride Safety Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

34-12-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-50

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-1 as present Code Section 25-15-50, and substituted “article” for “chapter” in this Code section.

25-15-51.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Amusement ride” means any mechanical device, other than those regulated by the Consumer Products Safety Commission, which carries or conveys passengers along, around, or over a fixed or restricted route or course or within a defined area for the purpose of giving its passengers amusement, pleasure, thrills, or excitement. Such term shall not include any such device which is not permanently fixed to a site.

“Authorized person” means a competent person experienced and instructed in the work to be performed who has been given the responsibility to perform his or her duty by the owner or his or her representative.

“Certificate fee” means the fee charged by the office for a certificate to operate an amusement ride.

“Certificate of inspection” means a certificate issued by a licensed inspector that an amusement ride meets all relevant provisions of this article and the standards and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

“Commissioner” means the Safety Fire Commissioner.

“Licensed inspector” means a registered professional engineer or any other person who is found by the office to possess the requisite training and experience to perform competently the inspections required by this article and who is licensed by the office to perform inspections of amusement rides.

“Operator” means a person or persons actually engaged in or directly controlling the operation of an amusement ride.

“Office” means the office of Safety Fire Commissioner, which is designated to enforce the provisions of this article and to formulate and enforce standards and regulations.

“Owner” means a person, including the state or any of its subdivisions, who owns an amusement ride or, in the event that the amusement ride is leased, the lessee.

“Permit” means a permit to operate an amusement ride issued to an owner by the office.

“Permit fee” means the fee charged by the office for a permit to operate an amusement ride.

“Standards and regulations” means those standards and regulations formulated and enforced by the office.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 366, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 18; Code 1981, §

25-15-51

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-2 as present Code Section 25-15-51; substituted “article” for “chapter”, and substituted “office” for “department” throughout this Code section; deleted former paragraph (1), which read: “Reserved.”; redesignated former paragraphs (2) and (3) as present paragraphs (1) and (2), respectively; twice inserted “or her” in paragraph (2); redesignated former paragraph (3.1) as present paragraph (3); substituted “Safety Fire Commissioner” for “Commissioner of Labor” in paragraph (5); deleted former paragraph (6), which read: “ ‘Department’ means the Department of Labor, which is designated to enforce the provisions of this chapter and to formulate and enforce standards and regulations.”; redesignated former paragraphs (7) and (8) as present paragraphs (6) and (7), respectively; and added paragraph (8).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, “the” was inserted in paragraph (5).

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 04.02.20.01, 04.23.20.02, 05.12.20.02, 05.28.20.02, 06.11.20.01, 06.29.20.02, 07.15.20.01, 07.31.20.02. 08.15.20.01, 08.31.20.02, 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, and 03.31.21.03.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

25-15-52.
Consultation with persons knowledgeable in area of amusement rides; creation of committees.

The Commissioner shall be authorized to consult with persons knowledgeable in the area of the amusement ride industry and to create committees composed of such consultants to assist the Commissioner in carrying out his or her duties under this article.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 443, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 19; Code 1981, §

25-15-52

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-3 as present Code Section 25-15-52, and substituted “article” for “chapter” in this Code section.

25-15-53.
Formulation of standards and regulations for rides; related powers and duties.

The office shall formulate standards and regulations, or changes to such standards and regulations, for the safe assembly, disassembly, repair, maintenance, use, operation, and inspection of all amusement rides. The standards and regulations shall be reasonable and based upon generally accepted engineering standards, formulas, and practices pertinent to the industry. Formulation and promulgation of such standards and regulations shall be subject to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” It is recognized that risks presented to the general public by amusement rides which are frequently assembled and disassembled are different from those presented by amusement rides which are not frequently assembled and disassembled. Accordingly, the office is authorized to formulate different standards and regulations with regard to such differing classes of amusement rides.

The office shall:

Enforce all standards and regulations;

License inspectors for authorization to inspect amusement rides;

Issue permits upon compliance with this article and such standards and regulations adopted pursuant to this article; and

Establish a fee schedule for the issuance of permits for amusement rides.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 20; Code 1981, §

25-15-53

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-5 as present Code Section 25-15-53; substituted “office” for “department” throughout this Code section; and twice substituted “article” for “chapter” in paragraph (b)(3).

25-15-54.
Licensing of private inspectors.

The office may license such private inspectors as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-54

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-6 as present Code Section 25-15-54, and, in this Code section, substituted “office” for “department” near the beginning, and substituted “article” for “chapter” at the end.

25-15-55.
Application for permit to operate rides; operation prior to issuance of permit; certificate of inspection.

No amusement ride shall be operated, except for purposes of testing and inspection, until a permit for its operation has been issued by the office. The owner of an amusement ride shall apply for a permit to the office on a form furnished by the office providing such information as the office may require.

No such application shall be complete without including a certificate of inspection from a licensed inspector that the amusement ride meets all relevant provisions of this article and the standards and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. The cost of obtaining the certificate of inspection from a licensed inspector shall be borne by the owner or operator.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-7, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-55

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-7 as present Code Section 25-15-55; substituted “office” for “department” throughout subsection (a); and substituted “article” for “chapter” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

25-15-56.
Amusement ride inspection; issuance of certificate of inspection.

All amusement rides shall be inspected annually, and may be inspected more frequently, by a licensed inspector at the owner’s or operator’s expense. If the amusement ride meets all relevant provisions of this article and the standards and regulations adopted pursuant to this article, the licensed inspector shall provide to the owner or operator a certificate of inspection. All new amusement rides shall be inspected before commencing public operation.

Amusement rides and attractions may be required to be inspected by an authorized person each time they are assembled or disassembled in accordance with regulations and standards established under this article.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-8, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 34; Code 1981, §

25-15-56

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-8 as present Code Section 25-15-56, and substituted “article” for “chapter” throughout this Code section.

25-15-57.
Waiver of ride inspection requirement.

The office may waive the requirement of subsection (a) of Code Section 25-15-56 if the owner of an amusement ride gives satisfactory proof to the office that the amusement ride has passed an inspection conducted by a federal agency or by another state whose standards and regulations for the inspection of such an amusement ride are at least as stringent as those adopted pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-9, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 366, § 2; Code 1981, §

25-15-57

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-9 as present Code Section 25-15-57, and, in this Code section, substituted “office” for “department” twice, substituted “28-15-56” for “34-12-8”, and substituted “article” for “chapter”.

25-15-58.
Issuance of permits.

The office shall issue a permit to operate an amusement ride to the owner thereof upon successful completion of a safety inspection of the amusement ride conducted by a licensed inspector and upon receiving an application for permit with a certificate of insurance. The permit shall be valid for the calendar year in which issued.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-10, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 366, § 3; Code 1981, §

25-15-58

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-10 as present Code Section 25-15-58, and substituted “office” for “department” in the first sentence of this Code section.

25-15-59.
Owner recordkeeping.

The owner shall maintain up-to-date maintenance, inspection, and repair records between inspection periods for each amusement ride in accordance with such standards and regulations as are adopted pursuant to this article. Such records shall contain a copy of all inspection reports commencing with the last annual inspection, a description of all maintenance performed, and a description of any mechanical or structural failures or operational breakdowns and the types of actions taken to rectify these conditions.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-11, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-59

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-11 as present Code Section 25-15-59, and substituted “article” for “chapter” in the first sentence of this Code section.

25-15-60.
Ride operators; minimum age.

No person shall be permitted to operate an amusement ride unless he or she is at least 16 years of age. An operator shall be in attendance at all times that an amusement ride is in operation and shall operate no more than one amusement ride at any given time.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-12, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-60

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-12 as present Code Section 25-15-60, and inserted “or she” in this Code section.

25-15-61.
Accident reports.

The owner of the amusement ride shall report to the office any accident resulting in a fatality or an injury requiring immediate inpatient overnight hospitalization incurred during the operation of any amusement ride. The report shall be in writing, shall describe the nature of the occurrence and injury, and shall be mailed by first-class mail no later than the close of the next business day following the accident. Accidents resulting in a fatality shall also be reported immediately to the office in person or by phone in accordance with regulations adopted by the office.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-13, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 21; Code 1981, §

25-15-61

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-13 as present Code Section 25-15-61, and substituted “office” for “department” throughout this Code section.

25-15-62.
Liability insurance, bond, cash, or security coverage.

No person shall operate an amusement ride unless at the time there is in existence:

A policy of insurance in an appropriate amount determined by regulation insuring the owner and operator (if an independent contractor) against liability for injury to persons arising out of the operation of the amusement ride;

A bond in a like amount; provided, however, that the aggregate liability of the surety under such bond shall not exceed the face amount thereof; or

Cash or other security acceptable to the office.

Regulations under this article shall permit appropriate deductibles or self-insured retention amounts to such policies of insurance. The policy or bond shall be procured from one or more insurers or sureties acceptable to the office.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-14, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1632, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-62

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-14 as present Code Section 25-15-62; substituted “office” for “department” in paragraph (a)(3) and in the second sentence of subsection (b); and substituted “article” for “chapter” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

25-15-63.
Variances.

If any person would incur practical difficulties or unnecessary hardships in complying with the standards and regulations adopted pursuant to this article, or if any person is aggrieved by any order issued by the office, the person may make a written application to the office stating his or her grounds and applying for a variance. The office may grant such a variance in the spirit of the provisions of this article with due regard to public safety. The granting or denial of a variance by the office shall be in writing and shall describe the conditions under which the variance is granted or the reasons for denial. A record shall be kept of all variances granted by the office and such record shall be open to inspection by the public.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-15, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-63

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-15 as present Code Section 25-15-63, and, in this Code section, substituted “office” for “department” throughout, substituted “article” for “chapter” in the first and second sentences, inserted “or her” near the end of the first sentence, and deleted “the” preceding “public safety” near the end of the second sentence.

25-15-64.
Applicability of article.

This article shall not apply to any single-passenger coin operated amusement ride on a stationary foundation or to playground equipment such as swings, seesaws, slides, jungle gyms, rider propelled merry-go-rounds, moonwalks, and live rides.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-16, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1632, § 2; Code 1981, §

25-15-64

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-16 as present Code Section 25-15-64, and substituted “article” for “chapter” near the beginning of this Code section.

25-15-65.
Use of existing rides; period for compliance.

This article shall not be construed so as to prevent the use of any existing amusement ride found to be in a safe condition and to be in conformance with the standards and regulations adopted pursuant to this article. Owners of amusement rides in operation on or before the effective date of this article shall comply with the provisions of this article and the standards and regulations adopted pursuant to this article within six months after the adoption of such standards and regulations.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-17, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-65

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-17 as present Code Section 25-15-65, and, in this Code section, substituted “article” for “chapter” throughout, and substituted “such standards” for “said standards” near the end of the last sentence.

25-15-66.
Order for temporary cessation; injunction; penalties.

The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative may issue a written order for the temporary cessation of operation of an amusement ride if it has been determined after inspection to be hazardous or unsafe. Operations shall not resume until such conditions are corrected to the satisfaction of the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative.

In the event that an owner or operator knowingly allows the operation of an amusement ride after the issuing of a temporary cessation, the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative may initiate in the superior court any action for an injunction or writ of mandamus upon the petition of the district attorney or Attorney General. An injunction, without bond, may be granted by the superior court to the Commissioner for the purpose of enforcing this article.

Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation violating the provisions of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

In addition to the penalty provisions in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Commissioner shall have the power, after notice and hearing, to levy civil penalties as prescribed in the rules and regulations of the office in an amount not to exceed $5,000.00 upon any person, firm, partnership, or corporation failing to adhere to the requirements of this article and the rules and regulations promulgated under this article. The imposition of a penalty for a violation of this article or the rules and regulations promulgated under this article shall not excuse the violation or permit it to continue.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-18, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1632, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 366, § 4; Code 1981, §

25-15-66

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-18 as present Code Section 25-15-66; substituted “article” for “chapter” throughout this Code section; substituted “the Commissioner’s authorized representative” for “his authorized representative” twice in subsection (a) and in the first sentence of subsection (b); and substituted “office” for “department” near the middle of the first sentence of paragraph (c)(2).

Cross references.

Punishment for misdemeanors generally, §

17-10-3

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2012, a misspelling of “Commissioner’s” was corrected in the first sentence of subsection (b).

25-15-67.
Right of owner or operator to deny entry to rides; inspector’s right of access.

The owner or operator of an amusement ride may deny entry to a person to an amusement ride if in the owner’s or operator’s opinion the entry may jeopardize the safety of such person or the safety of any other person. Nothing in this Code section shall permit an owner or operator to deny an inspector access to an amusement ride when such inspector is acting within the scope of his or her duties under this article.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-19, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 34; Code 1981, §

25-15-67

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-19 as present Code Section 25-15-67, and, in the last sentence of this Code section, substituted “shall permit” for “will permit”, inserted “or her”, and substituted “article” for “chapter”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “Code” was inserted preceding “section” in the second sentence.

25-15-68.
State liability not created.

Neither this article nor any provision of this article shall be construed to place any liability on the State of Georgia, the office, or the Commissioner with respect to any claim by any person, firm, or corporation relating in any way whatsoever to amusement rides and any injury or damages arising therefrom.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-20, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1453, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-68

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-20 as present Code Section 25-15-68, and, in this Code section, substituted “article” for “chapter” twice, and substituted “office” for “department”.

25-15-69.
Regulation of amusement rides by counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions.

No county, municipality, or other political subdivision shall have the power to pass ordinances, resolutions, or other requirements regulating the construction, installation, inspection, maintenance, repair, or operation of amusement rides within the limits of such county, municipality, or other political subdivision. Any such ordinances, resolutions, or other requirements shall be void and of no effect; provided, however, that the provisions of this Code section shall not apply to local zoning ordinances or ordinances regulating location, siting requirements, or other development standards or conditions relative to amusement rides or their time of operation or noise levels generated. Nothing in this article preempts the imposition of regulatory fees or occupation taxes imposed by counties and municipalities pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 48.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-12-21, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 366, § 5; Code 1981, §

25-15-69

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 3/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-12-21 as present Code Section 25-15-69, and, in this Code section, deleted “heretofore passed” preceding “shall be void” in the second sentence, and substituted “article” for “chapter” in the last sentence.